Utah statutes.
59-13-311.   Tax is a lien against vehicle -- Removable only when tax is
paid.
The special fuel tax constitutes a lien upon, and has the effect of an
execution duly levied against, any vehicle in which special fuel is used.  The
lien may not be removed until the special fuel tax is paid or the vehicle
subject to the lien is sold in payment of the tax.
